Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4706
Court orders authorized.

If, at any time during the course of the proceedings, it is brought to the attention of the court that the prosecutor has failed to comply with section 29-4704, or an order issued pursuant to this section, the court may:

(1) Order the prosecutor to disclose materials not previously disclosed;

(2) Grant a continuance;

(3) Prohibit the prosecutor from calling a witness not disclosed or introducing in evidence the material not disclosed; or

(4) Enter such other order as it deems just under the circumstances.

Laws 2019, LB352, § 6.